Utah statutes.
9-4-914.   Capital reserve funds -- Capital reserve fund requirement --
Establishment of other funds.
(1) (a) (i)  The corporation may create and establish one or more reserve
funds, herein referred to as "capital reserve funds," from:
(A)  any proceeds of sale of notes or bonds, to the extent provided in the
resolution or resolutions of the corporation authorizing the issuance thereof;
(B)  any monies appropriated and made available by the state for the purpose
of the funds;
(C)  any monies directed by the corporation to be transferred to the funds;
and
(D)  any other monies which may be made available to the corporation for the
purpose of the funds from any other source or sources.
(ii)  All monies held in any capital reserve fund shall be used, as required,
solely for the payment of the principal of bonds or of the sinking fund
payments with respect to the bonds, the purchase or redemption of bonds, the
payment of interest on bonds, or the payment of any redemption premium
required to be paid when the bonds are redeemed prior to maturity.
(b) (i)  Monies in any capital reserve fund may not be withdrawn from the fund
at any time in an amount as would reduce the level of monies in the fund to
less than the capital reserve fund requirement, except for the purpose of
paying principal and redemption price of and interest on bonds and the sinking
fund payments, as the payments become due and for the payment of which other
monies of the corporation are not available.
(ii)  Any income or interest earned by the investment of monies held in any
fund may be transferred by the corporation to other funds or accounts of the
corporation to the extent that the transfer does not reduce the amount of the
fund to below the capital reserve fund requirement.
(c)  The corporation may provide by resolution or resolutions that it may not
issue bonds under a resolution or resolutions at any time if upon issuance the
amount in the capital reserve fund which will secure the bonds shall be less
than the capital reserve fund requirement, unless the corporation at the time
of issuance of the bonds shall deposit in the fund from the proceeds of the
bonds to be so issued, or other sources, an amount which, together with the
amount then in the fund, may not be less than the capital reserve fund
requirement.
(d)  In computing the amount of the capital reserve funds for the purpose of
this part, securities in which all or a portion of the funds shall be invested
shall be valued at par, cost, or by other method of valuation as the
corporation may provide by resolution.
(e) (i)  "Capital reserve fund requirement" means, as of any particular date
of computation, and with respect to any particular issue of bonds, an amount
as the corporation may provide, or may have previously provided, by
resolution, which amount may be in the form of a sum certain or a formula.
(ii)  In establishing reserves and setting capital reserve fund requirements,
the corporation shall consider the following:
(A)  the qualifications for obtaining an investment grade rating from one or
more nationally recognized bond rating agencies;
(B)  the economic feasibility and marketability of the bonds being issued,
taking into account all security for the bonds, including the capital reserve
fund; and
(C)  applicable requirements pertaining to reserve funds under federal and
state income tax laws and regulations.
(f) (i)  To assure the continued operation and solvency of the corporation for
carrying out of its corporate purposes, provision is made in Subsection (1)(b)
for the accumulation in the capital reserve funds of an amount equal to the
maximum capital reserve fund requirement.
(ii)  The president of the corporation shall annually, on or before December
first, certify to the governor and to the director of finance the amount, if
any, required to restore the capital reserve funds to the capital reserve fund
requirement.
(iii)  The governor may request from the Legislature an appropriation of the
certified amount to restore the capital reserve funds to the capital reserve
fund requirement.
(g)  Amounts appropriated, if any, shall be repaid to the General Fund of the
state, from any monies in excess of the amounts which the corporation
determines will keep it self-supporting.
(2)  The corporation may create and establish any other funds as may be
necessary or desirable for its corporate purposes.
